Iowa, session 2025-2026, 1339DP.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA:
TLSB 1339DP (2) 91
sc/ns

S.F. _____ H.F. _____
Section 1. Section 7A.3, subsection 1, paragraph f, Code
2025, is amended by striking the paragraph.
Sec. 2. Section 8A.202, subsection 1, paragraph e, Code
2025, is amended by striking the paragraph.
Sec. 3. Section 8A.202, subsection 1, paragraph k, Code
2025, is amended to read as follows:
k. Establish and administer standards for state agency
libraries and public libraries.
Sec. 4. Section 8A.204, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code
2025, is amended by striking the paragraph.
Sec. 5. Section 8A.209, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended
to read as follows:
1. An enrich Iowa program is established in the department
to provide direct state assistance to public libraries, to
support the open access and access plus interlibrary loan
programs, to provide public libraries with an incentive
to improve library services that are in compliance with
performance measures, and to reduce inequities among
communities in the delivery of library services based on
performance measures adopted by rule by the department. The
department shall adopt rules governing the allocation of moneys
appropriated by the general assembly for purposes of this
section to provide direct state assistance to eligible public
libraries. A public library is eligible for moneys under
this subchapter if it is in compliance with the department’s
performance measures.